Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 2. Acknowledgment of Instruments

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 6, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 19-11-201.
Power of attorney.

If any person who performs service in the uniformed services as principal executes a power of attorney designating an agent to act on his behalf in conformity with the law of Wyoming, such power of attorney is deemed legally sufficient and enforceable as to the powers granted the agent therein and shall be honored by any person, corporation or institution to whom the power of attorney is presented.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-11-202.
Acknowledgment of instrument by members of armed forces and their dependents before commissioned officer; form of certificate.

In addition to the acknowledgment of instruments in the manner and form otherwise authorized by law, persons who perform service in the uniformed services or their dependents, wherever located, may acknowledge the instruments before any commissioned officer who performs service in the uniformed services with the rank of second lieutenant or higher in the army, air force or marine corps, or ensign or higher in the navy or coast guard. The instrument is not invalid for failure to state therein the place of execution or acknowledgment. No authentication of the officer’s certificate of acknowledgment is required, but the officer taking the acknowledgment shall endorse thereon or attach thereto a certificate substantially in the following form:

On this day of , (year), before me, , the undersigned officer, personally appeared , Serial No. (If any) , known to me (or satisfactorily proven) to be performing service in the uniformed services (A dependent of , Serial No. (If any) , a person performing service in the uniformed services) and to be the person whose name is subscribed to the within instrument and acknowledged that he executed the same for the purposes therein contained, and the undersigned does further certify that he is, at the date of this certificate, a commissioned officer of the rank stated below and is performing service in the uniformed services. (Signature of the officer) (Rank and Serial No. of officer)and command to which attached.

Click to view

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 15, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 30-204; W.S. 1957, § 19-5; Laws 1961, ch. 123, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-1-103

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring execution of affidavit in presence of officer to be returned with absentee ballot, see §

22-9-112

.

As to acknowledgments generally, see §

34-1-113

.

§ 19-11-203.
Death of principal not to affect acts performed in good faith under power of attorney.

No person acting under any power of attorney made by any person who performs service in the uniformed services, during the time the principal remains in the armed forces, shall be held liable for an act upon the ground that the principal was not then alive if the act was performed in good faith and without actual knowledge of the death of the principal. The fact that any principal has been reported missing shall not in itself be considered as indicating the death of the principal.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 78, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 30-206; W.S. 1957, § 19-7; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-1-104

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.